apertium-ina.ina-CLEAN.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="pri" c="prient indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="hour"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- Verbs - Paradigms -->
    <pardef n="verbs">
      <e><p><l>r</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- cantar -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/ -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> <!-- canta/ (imp) -->
      <e><p><l>va</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/va -->
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/ra -->
      <e><p><l>rea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/rea -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="verbs-pp">
      <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e> <!-- canta/te -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="verbs-pprs">
      <e><p><l>nte</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>  <!-- canta/nte -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="verbs-subj"> <!-- subjunctive RL, better solution? -->
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p></e> <!-- que io canta (subj RL?)-->
      <e r="RL"><p><l>va</l><r><s n="pis"/></r></p></e>  <!-- si io cantava (subj RL?)-->
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>  <!-- quando io cantara (subj RL?) -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ar-verbs">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="er-verbs">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e> <!-- cred-i-te -->
      <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e> <!-- cred-e-nte -->
      <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="er-ie-verbs"> <!-- irregular-er -->
      <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e> <!-- fac-i-te -->
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e> <!-- fac-ie-nte -->
      <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ir-verbs">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e> <!-- part-i-te -->
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e> <!-- part-ie-nte -->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/esser"> <!-- this should probably not be vblex; if it is, it could be factored -->
      <e><p><l>esser</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>   <!-- esser -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ser</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>   <!-- ser -->
      <e><p><l>sia</l><r><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> <!-- sia -->
      <e><p><l>sia</l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p></e> <!-- sia (subj) -->
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>esse</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>son</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>so</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>somos</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>esseva</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>  <!-- esseva = era, era is preferred -->
      <e><p><l>essera</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sera</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esserea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>serea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essente</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essi</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>esse</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/haber">  <!-- hard to collapse with vblex paradigms -->
      <e><p><l>haber</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- haber -->
      <e><p><l>ha</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>habe</l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>  <!-- indicative habe (LR because "ha" is prefered)-->
      <e><p><l>habeva</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>habera</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>haberea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>habi</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>habe</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e>
      <e><p><l>habe</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ir__/vader__vblex">  <!-- hard to collapse with vblex paradigms -->
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vader</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- ir = vader -->
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vade</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e> <!-- io va = io vade = io i -->
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vade</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e> <!-- subj "que io vade" (Using RL for subjunctives, maybe there is a better solution)-->
      <e><p><l>iva</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vadeva</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p></e> <!-- io iva = io vadeva -->
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vadeva</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/></r></p></e>  <!-- subj "si io vadeva"(Using RL for subjunctives, maybe there is a better solution)-->
      <e><p><l>ira</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vadera</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e> <!-- io ira = io vadera -->
      <e r="RL"><p><l>vadera</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e> <!-- subj "quando io vadera" (Using RL for subjunctives, maybe there is a better solution)-->
      <e><p><l>irea</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vaderea</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e> <!-- io irea = io vaderea -->
      <e><p><l>vadente</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iente</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e> <!-- vadente = iente -->
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>vadite</l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e> <!-- ite = vadite -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cant/ar__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ar-verbs"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cred/er__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="er-verbs"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fac/er__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="er-ie-verbs"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="part/ir__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ir-verbs"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ir"><i></i><par n="/ir__/vader__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adolescer"><i>adolesc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="alliar"><i>alli</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amollir"><i>amoll</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apperciper"><i>appercip</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arrestar"><i>arrest</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assister"><i>assist</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bastir"><i>bast</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="benefacer"><i>benefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bituminisar"><i>bituminis</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="calefacer"><i>calefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="catapultar"><i>catapult</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="circuir"><i>circu</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cocer"><i>coc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="conciper"><i>concip</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="continer"><i>contin</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="contrafacer"><i>contrafac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="convenir"><i>conven</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="coparticipar"><i>coparticip</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="decader"><i>decad</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="devenir"><i>deven</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dietar"><i>diet</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disfacer"><i>disfac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disflorescer"><i>disfloresc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disservir"><i>disserv</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="divagar"><i>divag</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esturdir"><i>esturd</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="exequer"><i>exequ</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="facer"><i>fac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="farcir"><i>farc</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fenar"><i>fen</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imbellir"><i>imbell</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imboscar"><i>imbosc</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="incandescer"><i>incandesc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="invalidar"><i>invalid</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jacer"><i>jac</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="malfacer"><i>malfac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mentir"><i>ment</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="misjudicar"><i>misjudic</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obir"><i>ob</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="olfacer"><i>olfac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pensar"><i>pens</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="perder"><i>perd</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pervenir"><i>perven</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="precalefacer"><i>precalefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="propeller"><i>propell</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="quantisar"><i>quantis</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rarefacer"><i>rarefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reassalir"><i>reassal</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reciper"><i>recip</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reeliger"><i>reelig</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="remesurar"><i>remesur</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repentir"><i>repent</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="retener"><i>reten</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rubefacer"><i>rubefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sasir"><i>sas</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="satisfacer"><i>satisfac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="septuplar"><i>septupl</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="subjunger"><i>subjung</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sufficer"><i>suffic</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tegular"><i>tegul</i><par n="cant/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="torrefacer"><i>torrefac</i><par n="fac/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="transcriber"><i>transcrib</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="transir"><i>trans</i><par n="part/ir__vblex"/></e>
